District of Columbia statutes.
42-3509.02

Attorney’s fees.

The Rent Administrator, Rental Housing Commission, or a court of competent jurisdiction may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party in any action under this chapter, except actions for eviction authorized under § 42-3505.01.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 902, 32 DCR 3089
This section is referenced in § 42-3505.06.
1981 Ed., § 45-2592.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3509.01.